Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF433.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2288YH (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 433 Section 1. Section 321.34, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 11E. National wild turkey federation plates. 3 a. Upon application and payment of the proper fees, the 4 director may issue national wild turkey federation plates to 5 the owner of a motor vehicle subject to registration under 6 section 321.109, subsection 1, autocycle, motor truck, motor 7 home, multipurpose vehicle, motorcycle, trailer, or travel 8 trailer. 9 b. National wild turkey federation plates shall be designed 10 by the department in cooperation with the Iowa chapter of the 11 national wild turkey federation. 12 c. The special national wild turkey federation fee for 13 letter-number designated national wild turkey federation plates 14 is twenty-five dollars. An applicant may obtain personalized 15 national wild turkey federation plates upon payment of the fee 16 for personalized plates as provided in subsection 5, which is 17 in addition to the special national wild turkey federation fee. 18 d. The fees collected by the director under this subsection 19 shall be paid monthly to the treasurer of state and deposited 20 in the road use tax fund. The treasurer of state shall 21 transfer monthly from the statutory allocations fund created 22 under section 321.145, subsection 2, to the general fund of the 23 state the amount of the special fees collected in the previous 24 month for national wild turkey federation plates. Such 25 moneys are appropriated to the department of natural resources 26 to distribute in the form of grants to support wild turkey 27 habitat conservation and hunting in Iowa. In the awarding of 28 grants, the department of natural resources shall give first 29 consideration to any state chapter of a nonprofit organization 30 supporting wild turkey habitat conservation and improvement, 31 and efforts to increase the number of hunters in this state, 32 and similar nonprofit organizations. Notwithstanding section 33 8.33, moneys appropriated under this subsection shall not 34 revert. 35 -1- LSB 2288YH (2) 91 th/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 433 e. Upon receipt of the special registration plates, the 1 applicant shall surrender the current registration plates to 2 the county treasurer. The county treasurer shall validate 3 the special registration plates in the same manner as regular 4 registration plates are validated under this section. The 5 annual special national wild turkey federation fee for 6 letter-number designated plates is ten dollars which shall be 7 paid in addition to the regular annual registration fee. The 8 annual fee for personalized national wild turkey federation 9 plates is ten dollars which shall be paid in addition to the 10 annual special national wild turkey federation fee and the 11 regular annual registration fee. The annual special national 12 wild turkey federation fee shall be credited as provided under 13 paragraph âdâ . 14 f. The department shall not condition the issuance of 15 national wild turkey federation plates on the receipt of any 16 number of orders for national wild turkey federation plates. 17